ctranslate-ol/frontend/dictionaries/dsb_DE.aff
FLAG num
SFX 136 Y 33
SFX 136 0 ach .
SFX 136 0 achmej .
SFX 136 0 achmy .
SFX 136 0 achu .
SFX 136 0 ašo .
SFX 136 0 aštej .
SFX 136 0 ašćo .
SFX 136 0 e .
SFX 136 0 ech .
SFX 136 0 echmej .
SFX 136 0 echmy .
SFX 136 0 echu .
SFX 136 0 ešo .
SFX 136 0 eštej .
SFX 136 0 ešćo .
SFX 136 0 i .
SFX 136 0 im .
SFX 136 0 imej .
SFX 136 0 imy .
SFX 136 0 itej .
SFX 136 0 iśo .
SFX 136 0 iš .
SFX 136 0 mej .
SFX 136 0 my .
SFX 136 0 o .
SFX 136 0 om .
SFX 136 0 omej .
SFX 136 0 omy .
SFX 136 0 otej .
SFX 136 0 ośo .
SFX 136 0 oš .
SFX 136 0 tej .
SFX 136 0 ćo .
SFX 137 Y 24
SFX 137 0 a .
SFX 137 0 ach .
SFX 137 0 am .
SFX 137 0 ami .
SFX 137 0 i .
SFX 137 0 ijo .
SFX 137 0 ijom .
SFX 137 0 ijomej .
SFX 137 0 ijomy .
SFX 137 0 ijotej .
SFX 137 0 ijośo .
SFX 137 0 ijoš .
SFX 137 0 iju .
SFX 137 0 im .
SFX 137 0 imej .
SFX 137 0 imy .
SFX 137 0 itej .
SFX 137 0 iśo .
SFX 137 0 iš .
SFX 137 0 oma .
SFX 137 0 ow .
SFX 137 0 owu .
SFX 137 0 u .
SFX 137 0 y .
SFX 138 Y 2
SFX 138 0 oma .
SFX 138 0 owu .
SFX 139 Y 3
SFX 139 0 ej .
SFX 139 0 eju .
SFX 139 0 yma .
SFX 140 Y 3
SFX 140 0 im .
SFX 140 0 ogo .
SFX 140 0 omu .
SFX 141 Y 4
SFX 141 0 o .
SFX 141 0 och .
SFX 141 0 om .
SFX 141 0 omi .
SFX 142 Y 22
SFX 142 0 a .
SFX 142 0 ach .
SFX 142 0 am .
SFX 142 0 ami .
SFX 142 0 i .
SFX 142 0 ijo .
SFX 142 0 ijom .
SFX 142 0 ijomej .
SFX 142 0 ijomy .
SFX 142 0 ijotej .
SFX 142 0 ijośo .
SFX 142 0 ijoš .
SFX 142 0 iju .
SFX 142 0 imej .
SFX 142 0 imy .
SFX 142 0 itej .
SFX 142 0 iśo .
SFX 142 0 oma .
SFX 142 0 ow .
SFX 142 0 owu .
SFX 142 0 u .
SFX 142 0 y .
SFX 143 Y 20
SFX 143 0 ach .
SFX 143 0 am .
SFX 143 0 ami .
SFX 143 0 i .
SFX 143 0 ijo .
SFX 143 0 ijom .
SFX 143 0 ijomej .
SFX 143 0 ijomy .
SFX 143 0 ijotej .
SFX 143 0 ijośo .
SFX 143 0 ijoš .
SFX 143 0 iju .
SFX 143 0 imej .
SFX 143 0 imy .
SFX 143 0 itej .
SFX 143 0 iśo .
SFX 143 0 oma .
SFX 143 0 ow .
SFX 143 0 owu .
SFX 143 0 u .
SFX 144 Y 26
SFX 144 0 e .
SFX 144 0 ech .
SFX 144 0 echmej .
SFX 144 0 echmy .
SFX 144 0 echu .
SFX 144 0 eštej .
SFX 144 0 ešćo .
SFX 144 0 mej .
SFX 144 0 my .
SFX 144 0 o .
SFX 144 0 om .
SFX 144 0 omej .
SFX 144 0 omy .
SFX 144 0 otej .
SFX 144 0 ośo .
SFX 144 0 oš .
SFX 144 0 tej .
SFX 144 0 yjo .
SFX 144 0 yjom .
SFX 144 0 yjomej .
SFX 144 0 yjomy .
SFX 144 0 yjotej .
SFX 144 0 yjośo .
SFX 144 0 yjoš .
SFX 144 0 yju .
SFX 144 0 ćo .
SFX 145 Y 3
SFX 145 0 owu .
SFX 145 0 y .
SFX 145 0 yma .
SFX 146 Y 4
SFX 146 0 e .
SFX 146 0 owu .
SFX 146 0 y .
SFX 146 0 yma .
SFX 147 Y 4
SFX 147 0 mej .
SFX 147 0 my .
SFX 147 0 tej .
SFX 147 0 ćo .
SFX 148 Y 4
SFX 148 0 mej .
SFX 148 0 my .
SFX 148 0 tej .
SFX 148 0 śo .
SFX 149 Y 6
SFX 149 0 m .
SFX 149 0 mej .
SFX 149 0 my .
SFX 149 0 tej .
SFX 149 0 śo .
SFX 149 0 š .
SFX 150 Y 7
SFX 150 0 e .
SFX 150 0 m .
SFX 150 0 mej .
SFX 150 0 my .
SFX 150 0 tej .
SFX 150 0 śo .
SFX 150 0 š .
SFX 151 Y 7
SFX 151 0 mej .
SFX 151 0 my .
SFX 151 0 om .
SFX 151 0 tej .
SFX 151 0 u .
SFX 151 0 y .
SFX 151 0 ćo .
SFX 152 Y 8
SFX 152 0 e .
SFX 152 0 mej .
SFX 152 0 my .
SFX 152 0 om .
SFX 152 0 tej .
SFX 152 0 u .
SFX 152 0 y .
SFX 152 0 ćo .
SFX 153 Y 4
SFX 153 0 e .
SFX 153 0 ych .
SFX 153 0 ym .
SFX 153 0 ymi .
SFX 154 Y 9
SFX 154 0 u .
SFX 154 0 yjo .
SFX 154 0 yjom .
SFX 154 0 yjomej .
SFX 154 0 yjomy .
SFX 154 0 yjotej .
SFX 154 0 yjośo .
SFX 154 0 yjoš .
SFX 154 0 yju .
SFX 155 Y 9
SFX 155 0 i .
SFX 155 0 yjo .
SFX 155 0 yjom .
SFX 155 0 yjomej .
SFX 155 0 yjomy .
SFX 155 0 yjotej .
SFX 155 0 yjośo .
SFX 155 0 yjoš .
SFX 155 0 yju .
SFX 156 Y 8
SFX 156 0 yjo .
SFX 156 0 yjom .
SFX 156 0 yjomej .
SFX 156 0 yjomy .
SFX 156 0 yjotej .
SFX 156 0 yjośo .
SFX 156 0 yjoš .
SFX 156 0 yju .
SFX 157 Y 17
SFX 157 0 a .
SFX 157 0 ach .
SFX 157 0 am .
SFX 157 0 ami .
SFX 157 0 e .
SFX 157 0 eju .
SFX 157 0 o .
SFX 157 0 om .
SFX 157 0 oma .
SFX 157 0 omej .
SFX 157 0 omy .
SFX 157 0 otej .
SFX 157 0 ow .
SFX 157 0 owu .
SFX 157 0 ośo .
SFX 157 0 oš .
SFX 157 0 u .
SFX 158 Y 22
SFX 158 0 a .
SFX 158 0 ach .
SFX 158 0 achmej .
SFX 158 0 achmy .
SFX 158 0 achu .
SFX 158 0 am .
SFX 158 0 ami .
SFX 158 0 ašo .
SFX 158 0 aštej .
SFX 158 0 ašćo .
SFX 158 0 e .
SFX 158 0 i .
SFX 158 0 m .
SFX 158 0 mej .
SFX 158 0 my .
SFX 158 0 oma .
SFX 158 0 ow .
SFX 158 0 owu .
SFX 158 0 tej .
SFX 158 0 u .
SFX 158 0 śo .
SFX 158 0 š .
SFX 159 Y 22
SFX 159 0 a .
SFX 159 0 ach .
SFX 159 0 am .
SFX 159 0 ami .
SFX 159 0 e .
SFX 159 0 ego .
SFX 159 0 ej .
SFX 159 0 eje .
SFX 159 0 eju .
SFX 159 0 em .
SFX 159 0 emu .
SFX 159 0 oju .
SFX 159 0 om .
SFX 159 0 oma .
SFX 159 0 ow .
SFX 159 0 owu .
SFX 159 0 u .
SFX 159 0 y .
SFX 159 0 ych .
SFX 159 0 ym .
SFX 159 0 yma .
SFX 159 0 ymi .
SFX 160 Y 23
SFX 160 0 a .
SFX 160 0 ach .
SFX 160 0 am .
SFX 160 0 ami .
SFX 160 0 e .
SFX 160 0 ego .
SFX 160 0 ej .
SFX 160 0 eje .
SFX 160 0 eju .
SFX 160 0 em .
SFX 160 0 emu .
SFX 160 0 i .
SFX 160 0 oju .
SFX 160 0 om .
SFX 160 0 oma .
SFX 160 0 ow .
SFX 160 0 owu .
SFX 160 0 u .
SFX 160 0 y .
SFX 160 0 ych .
SFX 160 0 ym .
SFX 160 0 yma .
SFX 160 0 ymi .
SFX 161 Y 23
SFX 161 0 a .
SFX 161 0 ach .
SFX 161 0 am .
SFX 161 0 ami .
SFX 161 0 e .
SFX 161 0 ego .
SFX 161 0 ej .
SFX 161 0 eje .
SFX 161 0 eju .
SFX 161 0 em .
SFX 161 0 emu .
SFX 161 0 o .
SFX 161 0 oju .
SFX 161 0 om .
SFX 161 0 oma .
SFX 161 0 ow .
SFX 161 0 owu .
SFX 161 0 u .
SFX 161 0 y .
SFX 161 0 ych .
SFX 161 0 ym .
SFX 161 0 yma .
SFX 161 0 ymi .
SFX 162 Y 23
SFX 162 0 a .
SFX 162 0 ach .
SFX 162 0 am .
SFX 162 0 ami .
SFX 162 0 e .
SFX 162 0 ego .
SFX 162 0 ej .
SFX 162 0 eje .
SFX 162 0 eju .
SFX 162 0 em .
SFX 162 0 emu .
SFX 162 0 o .
SFX 162 0 oju .
SFX 162 0 om .
SFX 162 0 oma .
SFX 162 0 ow .
SFX 162 0 owu .
SFX 162 0 u .
SFX 162 0 y .
SFX 162 0 ych .
SFX 162 0 ym .
SFX 162 0 yma .
SFX 162 0 ymi .
SFX 163 Y 22
SFX 163 0 ach .
SFX 163 0 am .
SFX 163 0 ami .
SFX 163 0 e .
SFX 163 0 ech .
SFX 163 0 echmej .
SFX 163 0 echmy .
SFX 163 0 echu .
SFX 163 0 eštej .
SFX 163 0 ešćo .
SFX 163 0 i .
SFX 163 0 o .
SFX 163 0 om .
SFX 163 0 oma .
SFX 163 0 omej .
SFX 163 0 omy .
SFX 163 0 otej .
SFX 163 0 ow .
SFX 163 0 owu .
SFX 163 0 ośo .
SFX 163 0 oš .
SFX 163 0 u .
SFX 164 Y 24
SFX 164 0 a .
SFX 164 0 ach .
SFX 164 0 am .
SFX 164 0 ami .
SFX 164 0 e .
SFX 164 0 ego .
SFX 164 0 ej .
SFX 164 0 eje .
SFX 164 0 eju .
SFX 164 0 em .
SFX 164 0 emu .
SFX 164 0 i .
SFX 164 0 im .
SFX 164 0 oju .
SFX 164 0 om .
SFX 164 0 oma .
SFX 164 0 ow .
SFX 164 0 owu .
SFX 164 0 u .
SFX 164 0 y .
SFX 164 0 ych .
SFX 164 0 ym .
SFX 164 0 yma .
SFX 164 0 ymi .
SFX 165 Y 17
SFX 165 0 a .
SFX 165 0 ach .
SFX 165 0 am .
SFX 165 0 ami .
SFX 165 0 e .
SFX 165 0 o .
SFX 165 0 oju .
SFX 165 0 om .
SFX 165 0 oma .
SFX 165 0 omej .
SFX 165 0 omy .
SFX 165 0 otej .
SFX 165 0 ow .
SFX 165 0 owu .
SFX 165 0 ośo .
SFX 165 0 oš .
SFX 165 0 u .
SFX 166 Y 17
SFX 166 0 a .
SFX 166 0 ach .
SFX 166 0 am .
SFX 166 0 ami .
SFX 166 0 e .
SFX 166 0 o .
SFX 166 0 oju .
SFX 166 0 om .
SFX 166 0 oma .
SFX 166 0 omej .
SFX 166 0 omy .
SFX 166 0 otej .
SFX 166 0 ow .
SFX 166 0 owu .
SFX 166 0 ośo .
SFX 166 0 oš .
SFX 166 0 u .
SFX 167 Y 21
SFX 167 0 ach .
SFX 167 0 achmej .
SFX 167 0 achmy .
SFX 167 0 achu .
SFX 167 0 ašo .
SFX 167 0 aštej .
SFX 167 0 ašćo .
SFX 167 0 e .
SFX 167 0 i .
SFX 167 0 im .
SFX 167 0 imej .
SFX 167 0 imy .
SFX 167 0 itej .
SFX 167 0 iśo .
SFX 167 0 iš .
SFX 167 0 m .
SFX 167 0 mej .
SFX 167 0 my .
SFX 167 0 tej .
SFX 167 0 śo .
SFX 167 0 š .
SFX 168 Y 19
SFX 168 0 ach .
SFX 168 0 achmej .
SFX 168 0 achmy .
SFX 168 0 achu .
SFX 168 0 ašo .
SFX 168 0 aštej .
SFX 168 0 ašćo .
SFX 168 0 e .
SFX 168 0 i .
SFX 168 0 im .
SFX 168 0 imej .
SFX 168 0 imy .
SFX 168 0 itej .
SFX 168 0 iśo .
SFX 168 0 iš .
SFX 168 0 mej .
SFX 168 0 my .
SFX 168 0 tej .
SFX 168 0 śo .
