ctranslate-ol/frontend/dictionaries/dsb_DE.dic
Balkow/159
Bogow/159
Bóž/161
Bělow/159
Jankow/159
Jurow/159
Kanow/159
Kuš/159
Mokr/161
Rakow/159
awtochton/159
bit/159
bjakan/164
blaban/164
blaran/164
brošn/161
byt/159
byzan/164
běl/168
celaźin/159
chachan/164
chlump/148
chrjochan/164
chwal/168
dobój/150
domysl/143
donatwar/1,155
dopśeměŕ/148
dopśigron/1,156
doros/147
dostoj/150
dotwar/1,155
dowěr/1,137
dozjěz/147
drjewjan/159
drozn/159
dump/148
dut/159
embargow/159
filigran/159
gjagotan/164
gnercan/164
gnil/168
grakan/164
grat/159
gwězdn/161
gój/167
głosol/168
gływuš/1,146
hympol/168
jebj/1,165
kaj/166
kal/168
kašlan/164
kisal/168
kisał/161
kjachan/164
kjagotan/164
kjawcan/164
kjawkan/164
klakan/164
klěcan/164
kmjeń/148
kontow/159
kopol/168
krad/159
kukan/164
kwakan/164
kósćej/166
kšaj/166
lan/159
laš/159
lětan/164
ma/149
maskulin/159
maskulinum/159
mjakotan/164
mjatł/161
mjawkan/164
mroj/158
myt/161
módŕ/148
městn/161
nabron/1,156
nabój/150
nacet/159
nakur/1,156
nakuŕ/148
naměstn/161
naros/147
nastoj/150
našar/1,156
našćěŕ/148
nik/1,140
njama/149
njebombol/168
njebój/150
njeběl/168
njebłomjeń/148
njechmjel/168
njechwal/168
njedar/1,137
njedej/150
njedobój/150
njedogóŕ/148
njedojěz/147
njedoměr/1,156
njedopśigron/1,156
njedoros/147
njedostoj/150
njedowěr/1,137
njedozgón/1,156
njedozgóń/148
njedozjěz/147
njegnil/168
njegój/167
njegól/168
njegłažań/148
njegłosol/168
njehympol/168
njejs/1,151
njekabej/168
njekal/168
njekisal/168
njeklij/168
njekokul/168
njekral/168
njekružel/168
njekuŕ/148
njemanźel/168
njenabjeŕ/148
njenabój/150
njenahur/1,156
njenajěz/147
njenapjekoŕ/148
njenastoj/150
njenawuron/1,156
njenawěz/147
njenažeŕ/148
njepal/168
njepleś/136
njepopjel/168
njepóbron/1,156
njepóbój/150
njepóceń/148
njepódros/147
njepódstoj/150
njepógron/1,156
njepóměr/1,156
njepóros/147
njepóstoj/150
njepóstwóŕ/148
njepótwar/1,156
njepóśěn/1,156
njepśebój/150
njepśedstoj/150
njepśedznamjen/1,156
njepśegrěb/148
njepśejěz/147
njepśemóž/144
njepśestoj/150
njepśijěz/147
njepśiklin/1,156
njepśimjeń/148
njepśiros/147
njepśistoj/150
njepśitwór/1,156
njepšaw/161
njerozcerwjen/1,156
njerozjěz/147
njerozpar/1,156
njerozpromjeń/148
njerozros/147
njerozstoj/150
njerozžen/1,154
njesmól/168
njesokol/168
njespar/1,156
njespisowaśel/168
njestam/148
njestoj/150
njetrětol/168
njewez/147
njewobpěn/1,156
njewobros/147
njewobseń/148
njewobstoj/150
njewobwar/1,156
njewowez/147
njewubój/150
njewugliń/148
njewukman/1,156
njewumóž/144
njewupowěz/147
njewupyr/1,156
njewustoj/150
njewuwaŕ/148
njewuwez/147
njewuśěr/1,156
njewólenj/1,157
njewósłon/1,156
njewótjěz/147
njewótkap/148
njewótros/147
njewótsen/1,156
njewótstoj/150
njewěz/147
njezabój/150
njezadrap/148
njezamór/1,156
njezapowěz/147
njezastoj/150
njezawez/147
njezašaŕ/148
njezašćan/1,156
njezdrjal/168
njezestoj/150
njezros/147
njezroń/148
njezybol/168
nješpingel/168
nježwal/168
nuchan/164
o-nog/1,138
pasat/159
pazoŕ/148
platow/159
plěch/159
prumsan/164
pyskan/164
póbyt/159
póbój/150
pócyn/1,156
póddan/164
pódros/147
pódstoj/150
pódtwar/1,155
pódwóc/1,145
pókuŕ/148
pókšyt/159
pólej/166
pótor/1,156
pótwar/1,155
pówětšon/159
póśich/1,162
póžeŕ/148
pśebój/150
pśedpowěz/147
pśedstoj/150
pśemóž/144
pśeros/147
pśestoj/150
pśezgón/1,156
pśežwantoŕ/148
pśipowěz/147
pśistarjejš/1,153
pśistoj/150
pśiswójźb/1,142
pšaw/161
rikan/164
rolow/159
rozcer/1,156
rozgrěb/148
rozjěz/147
rozros/147
rozstoj/150
rozžen/1,154
s/152
sedymj/1,141
silow/159
skokan/164
skokotan/164
skub/148
smal/168
smarcan/164
snochtan/164
sobuźěl/168
sochan/164
spódar/1,156
stanj/1,165
star/159
stoj/150
stojan/164
stolětn/161
styrj/1,141
suseźin/159
swět/159
swětł/161
słon/160
słuchan/164
tretol/168
twór/1,137
tšulan/164
tšuran/164
tšut/159
wez/147
wjelican/164
wob/139
wobgóspodaŕ/148
wobmysl/143
wobros/147
wobstoj/150
wokol/168
wowez/147
wołam/148
wubój/150
wucerwjen/1,156
wuchow/159
wukšaj/166
wumóž/144
wupowěz/147
wusemjen/1,156
wusliń/148
wustoj/150
wutor/1,137
wuwez/147
wušpjer/1,156
wólej/166
wólenj/1,157
wóstanj/1,157
wósymj/1,141
wótcyń/148
wótjěz/147
wótkur/1,156
wótmysl/143
wótros/147
wótsen/1,155
wótstoj/150
wótš/1,162
wótšyr/1,156
wózn/161
wětš/159
włožń/148
zabój/150
zajěz/147
zamór/1,155
zastarjejš/1,153
zastoj/150
zaton/1,155
zawóŕ/148
zaśich/1,162
zašar/1,156
zemjan/159
zjěz/147
změŕ/148
zrosć/163
zybol/168
zł/1,162
złot/161
śich/1,162
śopł/161
škrjon/161
šćipan/164
šćokan/164
žwal/168
žyt/161
